California, session 20252026, AB2155.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. (a) The Legislature finds and declares that it is the policy of this state to ensure that all persons have the full benefit of the rights, forums, and procedures established under state law.(b) It is the purpose of this act to incorporate into the California Arbitration Act any and all exclusions under the Federal Arbitration Act (9 U.S.C. Sec. 1 et seq.), including contracts of employment of seamen, railroad employees, or any other class of workers engaged in foreign or interstate commerce, and the Ending Forced Arbitration of Sexual Assault and Sexual Harassment Act of 2021 (9 U.S.C. Sec. 401 et seq.), including claims that relate to a sexual harassment dispute or sexual assault dispute.SEC. 2. Section 1281 of the Code of Civil Procedure is amended to read:1281. (a) A written agreement to submit to arbitration an existing controversy or a controversy thereafter arising is valid, enforceable and irrevocable, save upon such grounds as exist for the revocation of any contract.(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a written agreement to submit to arbitration is not enforceable under this section to the extent the agreement is not enforceable under the Federal Arbitration Act (9 U.S.C. Sec. 1 et seq.).